Maine, session 132, LD1274.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4311, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. SSSS, §1, is
further amended by enacting at the end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
The department may not reimburse a single municipality in an amount totaling more than
50% of the funds reimbursed to municipalities for general assistance in a fiscal year.